Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.4 Debris and Wreckage Removal in Disasters

30-15.4-1.
Authority of governor.

Whenever the governor has declared a disaster emergency to exist under the laws of this state, or the president of the United States, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state, the governor is authorized:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, through the use of state departments or agencies, or the use of any of the state’s instrumentalities, to clear or remove from publicly or privately owned land or water, debris and wreckage that may threaten public health or safety, or public or private property; and

To accept funds from the federal government and utilize those funds to make grants to any local government for the purpose of removing debris or wreckage from publicly or privately owned land or water.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 39.

30-15.4-2.
Conditions of removal or clearance.

Authority under this chapter shall be exercised unless the affected local government, corporation, organization, or individual shall first present an unconditional authorization for removal of the debris or wreckage from public and private property, and, in the case of removal of debris or wreckage from private property, shall first agree to indemnify the state government against any claim arising from the removal.

Whenever the governor provides for clearance of debris or wreckage pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, employees of the designated state agencies or individuals appointed by the state are authorized to enter upon private land or waters and perform any tasks necessary to the removal or clearance operation.

Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any state employee or agent complying with orders of the governor and performing duties pursuant thereto under this chapter shall not be liable for the death of, or injury to, any persons or damage to any property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1.

30-15.4-3.
Rules and regulations.

The governor is authorized to make rules and regulations to carry out this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 124, § 1.